Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0102.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) Except as provided in subsection (6), a county treasurer shall make on request a transcript of any paper or record on file in the treasurerâs office for the following fees: (a) For an abstract of taxes on any description of land, 25 cents for each year covered by the abstract. (b) For an abstract with statement of name and residence of taxpayers, 25 cents per year for each description of land covered by the abstract. (c) For 1 copy of any paper or document, at the rate of 25 cents per 100 words. (d) For each certificate, 25 cents. (2) For statements in respect to the payment of taxes required by section 135 of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.135, except as provided in subsection (6), the county treasurer shall collect 20 cents for each description of land contained in the certificate, but the total amount paid must not be less than $5.00. (3) Except as provided in subsection (6), an abstract, list, copy, or statement made as required by this act must not be furnished for a sum less than 50 cents. (4) All money collected under this act must be credited to the general fund of the county. (5) Except as provided in subsection (6), a charter county with a population of more than 2,000,000 may impose by ordinance a different amount for the fees prescribed by this section. A charter county shall not impose a fee that is greater than the cost of the service for which the fee is charged. (6) A request for an electronic copy of records under this subsection is not subject to subsection (1), (2), (3), or (5). The maximum charge must be 30 cents per parcel record, not to exceed $2,000.00 for each request under this section, if the request is for an electronic copy of records in an electronic data file that is maintained, controlled, managed, or possessed by the county treasurer. A response to a request for an electronic copy of records in the electronic data file must be transmitted electronically using a format that is documented by an open standards organization and that has defined, delimited fields. If the county treasurer maintains, controls, manages, or possesses any electronic records containing any of the following information in the record for each parcel of real property in the county for the requested tax year, the county treasurer must provide those electronic records under the terms of this subsection: (a) The taxable value. (b) The state equalized value. (c) The assessed value. (d) Past sale data. (e) Property classification. (f) Property address. (g) Parcel identification number. (h) Owner name and address. (i) Taxpayer name and address. (j) Principal residence status. (k) Other tax equalization data. (l) Special assessments. (m) Total millage rate. (n) Enumerated millage list. (o) Tax bill amount for winter tax bill. (p) Tax bill amount for summer tax bill. (7) A request for an electronic copy of records under subsection (6) that includes a request for both the tax bill amount for winter tax bill under subsection (6)(o) and the tax bill amount for summer tax bill under subsection (6)(p) is a single request under subsection (6). If both amounts are available at the time of the request, the maximum charge for the request is $2,000.00. (8) Copies of records obtained under subsection (6) may not be resold for a commercial purpose. (9) Nothing in subsection (6) requires the county treasurer to provide any information that is not maintained, controlled, managed, or possessed by the county treasurer. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor